Colorado, session 2026A, HB1060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) It is necessary to clarify the application of state jurisdiction, or
venue, to address the complexities of modern, often remote criminal
offenses, thereby ensuring that individuals who inflict injury or cause
harm to Colorado residents are subject to prosecution in this state
consistent with the purpose of maintaining public safety and integrity in
the state's criminal justice system; and
(b) Clarifying state jurisdiction is particularly vital to ensuring
justice for the elderly population of Colorado, who constitute the most
frequent victims of fraud and cross-border schemes and who must be
protected by the full authority of Colorado law when suffering loss.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1-201, amend (2);
and add (4) as follows:
18-1-201. State jurisdiction - definition.
(2) An offense is committed partly within this state if conduct
occurs in this state which THAT is an element of an offense or if the result
of conduct in this state is such an element. In homicide, the "result" is
either the physical contact which causes death or the death itself; and if
the body of a criminal homicide victim is found within the state, the death
is presumed to have occurred within the state.
(4) (a) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES, "RESULT" MEANS:
-2- HB26-1060

(I) THE EFFECT OF CONDUCT THAT CAUSES INJURY, LOSS, OR
DAMAGE, INCLUDING INJURY, LOSS, OR DAMAGE TO, OR DEPRIVATION OF,
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
(A) A THING OF VALUE;
(B) RIGHTS OR PRIVILEGES PROTECTED BY THE FEDERAL AND
STATE CONSTITUTIONS AND LAWS;
(C) ACCESS TO INFORMATION, INCLUDING ELECTRONIC
INFORMATION; OR
(D) THE VICTIM'S IDENTITY; AND
(II) IN HOMICIDE, EITHER THE PHYSICAL CONTACT THAT CAUSES
DEATH OR THE DEATH ITSELF; AND IF THE BODY OF A CRIMINAL HOMICIDE
VICTIM IS FOUND IN THE STATE, THE DEATH IS PRESUMED TO HAVE
OCCURRED IN THE STATE.
(b) A PERSON DOES NOT NEED ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE THAT THE
VICTIM IS LOCATED IN THE STATE TO BE PROSECUTED FOR A CRIMINAL
OFFENSE IN THE STATE.
SECTION 3. Effective date - applicability. This act takes effect
July 1, 2026, and applies to offenses committed on or after said date.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- HB26-1060